Hawaii statutes.
[§449-1.8] Confidential portion of
application or records. Information contained in any application or record
shall be made available to the public unless that information may be withheld
from public disclosure by the commissioner under chapter 92F. [L 2001, c 184,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next